src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NI_O_bagwaaniigin_gt-norm.yaml
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonyishibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonyishibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: nibagwaaniiginoonsishibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonsishibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsishibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoonyishibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyishibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyishibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoonsishibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsishibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsishibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoonyishibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyishibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyishibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoonsishibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsishibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsishibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: ibagwaaniiginoonyishibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: ibagwaaniiginoonyishibaniing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoonyishibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: ibagwaaniiginoonsishibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: ibagwaaniiginoonsishibaniing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoonsishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: nibagwaaniiginoonyinaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonyinaanibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonyinaanibaniig
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nibagwaaniiginoonyinaanidigan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonyinaanidiging
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonyinaanidigag
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: nibagwaaniiginoonsinaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonsinaanibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsinaanibaniig
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nibagwaaniiginoonsinaanidigan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonsinaanidiging
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsinaanidigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoonyinaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyinaanibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyinaanibaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoonyinaanidigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyinaanidiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyinaanidigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoonyiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyiwaabaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyiwaabaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoonyiwaadigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyiwaadiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyiwaadigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoonsinaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsinaanibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsinaanibaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoonsinaanidigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsinaanidiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsinaanidigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoonsiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsiwaabaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsiwaabaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoonsiwaadigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsiwaadiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsiwaadigag
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoonyiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyiniibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginoonyiniidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyiniidiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyiniidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoonyiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyiwaabaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyiwaabaniig
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginoonyiwaadigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyiwaadiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyiwaadigag
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoonsiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsiniibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsiniibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginoonsiniidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsiniidiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsiniidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoonsiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsiwaabaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsiwaabaniig
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginoonsiwaadigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsiwaadiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsiwaadigag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nibagwaaniiginomishinaaniban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nibagwaaniiginomishinaanidig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gibagwaaniiginomishinaaniban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomishinaanidig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gibagwaaniiginomishiwaaban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomishiwaadig
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt: obagwaaniiginomishiniiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: obagwaaniiginomishiniidin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: obagwaaniiginomishiwaaban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: obagwaaniiginomishiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nibagwaaniiginomishinaanin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginomishinaaning
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginomishinaanig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginomishinaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomishinaaning
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomishinaanig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginomishiwaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomishiwaang
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomishiwaag
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+4: obagwaaniiginomishiniwa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Loc: obagwaaniiginomishiniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Pl: obagwaaniiginomishiniwa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginomishiwaan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginomishiwaang
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginomishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: nibagwaaniiginomishibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nibagwaaniiginomishibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nibagwaaniiginomishibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginomishibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomishibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomishibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginomishibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginomishibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginomishibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: ibagwaaniiginomishibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: ibagwaaniiginomishibaniing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: ibagwaaniiginomishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nibagwaaniiginominaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nibagwaaniiginominaanibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nibagwaaniiginominaanibaniig
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nibagwaaniiginominaanidigan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginominaanidiging
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginominaanidigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginominaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginominaanibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginominaanibaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginominaanidigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginominaanidiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginominaanidigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginomiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomiwaabaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomiwaabaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginomiwaadigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomiwaadiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomiwaadigag
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+4+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginominiibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+4+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginominiibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+4+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginominiibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginominiidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginominiidiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginominiidigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginomiwaabaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: obagwaaniiginomiwaabaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: obagwaaniiginomiwaabaniig
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: obagwaaniiginomiwaadigan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginomiwaadiging
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginomiwaadigag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nibagwaaniiginoshinaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoshinaanibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoshinaanibaniig
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nibagwaaniiginoshinaanidigan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoshinaanidiging
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoshinaanidigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoshinaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoshinaanibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshinaanibaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoshinaanidigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoshinaanidiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshinaanidigag
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaabaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaabaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaabaniig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaadigan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaadiging
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaadigag
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: obagwaaniiginoshiniibaniin
